Louisiana, session 2026, HB1173.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:429.4(E) and (F)(1) and 863.1.2(B) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§429.4. Installment agreement; outstanding penalties, fines, and fees owed to the
office of motor vehicles
* * *
E. The failure to make a scheduled payment in accordance with the terms of
the installment agreement shall result in the missed scheduled payment being added
to the end of the payment schedule of the installment agreement and shall apply to
the first three missed payments. Upon a fourth, or any subsequent, missed payment
an assessment of a late fee in the amount of twenty-five dollars, which shall be added
to the total amount due. Upon the failure to receive a payment, the office of motor
vehicles shall send an electronic mail notification to the debtor to update the debtor's
payment information and pay the missed payment. If, after receiving the electronic
mail notice, the debtor updates the payment information, pays the late fee, and
submits the missed payment, the The installment agreement shall remain in place and
no further action will shall be taken until the fourth, and any subsequent, missed
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1173 ENROLLED
payment. In such case, the missed payment and late fee shall be received by the
office of motor vehicles prior to the next scheduled payment date.
F. Termination of installment agreement upon failure to make payment.
(1) If any installment payment is not paid on or before the date fixed for its
payment or rescheduled, and the debtor fails to make up the missed payment as
provided in Subsection E of this Section, the entire amount unpaid pursuant to the
installment agreement shall be paid by the debtor within a sixty-day period from the
date of notice and demand from the commissioner of the office of motor vehicles.
The notice shall further advise the debtor that his driver's license shall be suspended
upon the expiration of the sixty-day period if the payments due pursuant to the
installment agreement are not made current within that sixty-day period or the
agreement is not reinstated by the commissioner of the office of motor vehicles
within that sixty-day period. This notice shall be known as "Notice of Installment
Agreement Termination and Demand".
* * *
§863.1.2. Reinstatement Relief Program
* * *
B. The commissioner shall determine the amount of reinstatement fees that
the person owes. The person shall promptly pay the amount determined to be owed
no later than ten calendar days from the date that the commissioner sets the amount
that is owed. If the person needs to make payment arrangements, the person shall
execute an installment agreement with the office of motor vehicles. Such an
installment agreement shall only be for the amount determined to be owed by the
commissioner together with all fees associated with the installment agreement as
provided in R.S. 32:429.4. If a person executes an installment contract, that person
shall maintain eligibility to remain in the Reinstatement Relief Program only if they
make all payments required in the installment agreement. If a person fails to make
a timely payment and fails to pay the missed payment with the associated late fee
before the next scheduled payment meet the requirements of the installment
agreement pursuant to R.S. 32:429.4, the person shall be removed from the
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1173 ENROLLED
Reinstatement Relief Program and shall not be eligible to reenter the Reinstatement
Relief Program.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.